Washington statutes.
RCW 13.04.300

Juvenile may be both dependent and an offender.

Nothing in chapter 13.04, 13.06, 13.32A, 13.34, or 13.40 RCW may be construed to prevent a juvenile from being found both dependent and an offender if there exists a factual basis for such a finding.

[ 1983 c 3 s 15; 1979 c 155 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 155: See notes following RCW 13.04.011.